New York, session 2025-2026, S6108.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 190 of the labor law, as amended 2 by chapter 281 of the laws of 2002, is amended to read as follows: 3 3. "Employer" includes any person, corporation, limited liability 4 company, or association employing any individual in any occupation, 5 industry, trade, business or service. The term "employer" shall [not] 6 include [a governmental agency] counties, towns, villages, school 7 districts, and any other municipal corporations or public authorities. 8 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD10569-01-5